Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 7. National Guard Youth Challenge Program

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 114, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 19-9-701. [Repealed effective June 30, 2025.] National guard youth challenge program; administration of program.

The national guard youth challenge program is created to provide resources to create opportunities and alternatives for youth at risk or who have dropped out of the public school system, ages sixteen (16) to eighteen (18) years, to attain a high school diploma or high school equivalency certification and to develop life skills.

The national guard youth challenge program shall be administered by the Wyoming military department with the assistance of the department of education as necessary for the provision of educational programs addressing needs of the participating youth and for establishing necessary communications and cooperation with Wyoming school districts. Any student information obtained in accordance with W.S. 21-4-102(c) by the national guard youth challenge program shall be utilized for the sole purpose of recruitment for the national guard youth challenge program.

The Wyoming military department may promulgate rules for the administration of the program.

History:

Laws 2009, ch. 114, § 1; 2014 ch. 72, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), added the second sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 72, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 19-9-702. [Repealed effective June 30, 2025.] Funding.

To the extent available, for every forty cents ($.40) of federal funds appropriated to the national guard youth challenge program, the department may expend funds appropriated by this state for this program in an amount not to exceed sixty cents ($.60), or such other minimum amount as necessary to qualify for the appropriation of federal funds. The state may appropriate funding in excess of that necessary to qualify for federal funds and the department shall be authorized to expend such state funds only when all federal funds are exhausted. All monies appropriated for purposes of this article are continuously appropriated to the department and shall not lapse until the program is terminated as provided by W.S.

19-9-704

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 114, § 1; 2016 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “forty cents ($.40)” for “sixty cents ($.60) twice in first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 9 § 2, provides: “There is appropriated two million five hundred ten thousand four hundred eight dollars ($2,510,408.00) from the school foundation fund and one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) in federal funds to the Wyoming military department for the national guard youth challenge program.”

§ 19-9-703. [Repealed effective June 30, 2025.] Reporting.

The department shall include a report within any biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

in which the department seeks funding for the national guard youth challenge program. The report shall include the following information for each of the immediately preceding two (2) state fiscal years:

Yearly enrollment in the national guard youth challenge program;

Number of youth remaining after the first two (2) weeks of the challenge program;

Yearly number of youth successfully completing the challenge program;

A detailed listing of budget expenditures for the challenge program; and

A report on the status of program graduates to the extent available.

History:

Laws 2009, ch. 114, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (a)(intro) and deleted “for the preceding four (4) years” following “program graduates” in (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 19-9-704.
Sunset.

W.S.

19-9-701

through

19-9-703

are repealed effective June 30, 2025.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 114, § 1; 2012, ch. 18, § 1; 2016 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “June 30, 2017” for “June 30, 2012.”

Laws 2012, ch. 18 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “2025” for “2017.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 9 § 2, provides: “There is appropriated two million five hundred ten thousand four hundred eight dollars ($2,510,408.00) from the school foundation fund and one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) in federal funds to the Wyoming military department for the national guard youth challenge program.”